Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Division 1. Wyoming Retirement Act
§ 9-3-424.
Refund of contributions upon termination of employment; procedure; redeposit; limitation on refund.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, any member covered by this article, including an at-will contract employee under W.S. 9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)(III) or (IV), who terminates his employment or any employee of the agricultural extension service of the University of Wyoming who has not elected to continue to be covered by this article is entitled to a refund of his account. In addition, any member who is entitled to a refund who is an at-will contract employee under W.S. 9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)(III), shall be entitled to a refund of his account plus any employer matching contributions made by that member. In addition, any member who is entitled to a refund who is an at-will contract employee under W.S. 9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)(IV), shall be entitled to a refund of his account plus any employer matching contributions made by that member. The refunds shall be made only upon written request to the board. A member may elect, at the time and in the manner prescribed by the system, to have the refund of his account paid directly to an eligible retirement plan as specified by the member. Any member who withdraws from the system under this section shall forfeit all rights to further benefits, employer matching contributions and service credit under the system. Any person who later returns to service covered by this article may redeposit a single lump-sum amount equal to the amount of the contributions withdrawn, together with an amount equal to the actuarial equivalent of the benefits to be derived from the redeposit, past employer contributions, the individual’s attained age and the benefit structure of the appropriate plan, and upon earning not less than two (2) years service credit, may reestablish his service credits as of the time of withdrawal of his contributions. For service prior to July 1, 2002, any law enforcement member covered under W.S.

9-3-432

may redeposit the amount of contributions withdrawn for service covered under W.S.

9-3-432

, in a lump sum, together with interest and the actuarial equivalent of the difference between the benefit provided under W.S.

9-3-415

through

9-3-419

and the benefit provided under W.S. 9-3-432, and upon earning not less than two (2) years service credit, may reestablish his service credit as of the time of withdrawal of his contributions. Any redeposit payment pursuant to this subsection shall be made not later than ten (10) years following the date of reemployment or prior to retirement, whichever first occurs. A member may make a redeposit under this subsection with personal funds or, subject to rules and regulations established by the board, through rollover contributions. Unless received by the system in the form of a direct rollover, the rollover contribution shall be paid to the system on or before sixty (60) days after the date it was received by the member. Unless otherwise permitted by section 401(a)(8) of the Internal Revenue Code, forfeitures shall not be applied to increase the benefits that any employee would otherwise receive under the system.

No member is entitled to a refund of any contributions if he is employed for a salary by an employer.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 114, § 18; 1957, ch. 93, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-316; Laws 1959, ch. 86, § 3; 1961, ch. 176, § 2; 1967, ch. 69, § 1; 1971, ch. 263, §§ 6, 10; W.S. 1977, §§

9-3-422

, 9-5-222; Laws 1979, ch. 110, § 1; 1981, ch. 34, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 202, § 1; 1994, ch. 67, § 2; 1995, ch. 60, § 1; 1998, ch. 32, § 1; ch. 98, § 1; 2001, ch. 177, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 82, § 2; 2010, ch. 58, § 1; 2015 ch. 10, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2018 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a), added the present fifth and last three sentences.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a), substituted “an amount equal to the actuarial equivalent of the benefits to be derived from the redeposit, past employer contributions, the individual's attained age and the benefit structure of the appropriate plan” for “regular interest” and made a stylistic change in the fifth sentence, substituted “interest” for “regular interest” in the sixth sentence, and substituted “ten (10)” for “seven (7)” in the seventh sentence.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a), substituted “entitled to a refund of his account plus” for “entitled to a refund of all contributions made to his account plus” in the second sentence, and “entitled to a refund of his account plus any employer” for “entitled to a refund of all contributions made to his account including any employer” in the third sentence.

The 2021 amendment,

in the first sentence of (a), substituted "9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)(III) or (IV)" for "9-2-1022(a)(xi)(F)(III) or (IV)" and "9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)(III)" for "9-2-1022(a)(xi)(F)(III)" and substituted "9 2 3207(a)(xi)(F)(IV)" for "9-2-1022(a)(xi)(F)(IV)" in the second sentence.

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1995, ch. 60, § 2, as amended by Laws 2001, ch. 46, § 2, provides: “Notwithstanding section 1 of this act, any contributing member of the Wyoming retirement system as of April 1, 1995, who is eligible for reestablishing service credit under W.S. 9-3-424(a), shall make the redeposit payment required under W.S. 9-3-424(a) not later than April 1, 2004. Failure to make the required payment on or before April 1, 2004 shall result in forfeiture of any right to reestablish prior service credit in accordance with this act.”

Laws 2018, ch. 31, § 2, provides: “This act shall apply to the distribution
of benefits subject to this act made on and after the effective date
of this act.

“Nothing in
this act shall be construed to modify or impair existing contracts
or other obligations executed prior to the effective date of this
act.”

§ 9-3-425.
Right of members retired under terminated systems to retirement benefits from account; no prohibition to increase provided in W.S. 9-3-419.

Any member retired under one (1) of the terminated systems or continued in retirement under the system is entitled to receive service or disability retirement benefits from the retirement account in accordance with the terminated systems. This section does not prohibit an increase in benefits as provided for in W.S. 9-3-419(a).

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 114, § 19; W.S. 1957, § 9-317; Laws 1961, ch. 78, § 2; 1973, ch. 245, § 3; W.S. 1977, §§

9-3-423

, 9-5-223; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 202, § 1; 1994, ch. 67, § 2; 2012, ch. 107, § 2.

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “W.S.

9-3-419

(a)” for “W.S.

9-3-419

.”

Laws 2012, ch. 107, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2012.

§ 9-3-426.
Benefits, allowances and contents of account exempt from taxation and not subject to execution or attachment; assignment limited; qualified domestic relations order; system assets.

The benefits and allowances and the cash and securities in the account created by this article:

Are exempt from any state, county or municipal tax of this state;

Are not subject to execution or attachment by trustee process or otherwise, in law or equity, or under any other process whatsoever;

Shall not be used for any purpose other than a purpose specified in W.S. 9-3-407(c); and

Are not assignable except as specifically provided in this article.

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 149, § 2.

The retirement system including the Wyoming state highway patrol, game and fish warden and criminal investigator retirement program, any paid firemen’s pension plan established under the firemen’s pension account created by W.S.

15-5-202

and any plan through the volunteer firefighter, EMT and search and rescue pension account established under W.S.

35-9-617

, shall pay retirement benefits in accordance with any qualified domestic relations order for the payment of a specified percentage of a member’s benefits or account to an alternate payee, for a specified number of payments or period of time and from a specified retirement plan. Upon request of the alternate payee, a lump sum refund of the alternate payee’s percentage of the member’s account shall be paid pursuant to the qualified domestic relations order. Acceptance by the alternate payee of the lump sum refund terminates his right to any further payment or benefit provided by the retirement system. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the retirement system is exempt from the qualified order unless:

Benefits are paid pursuant to the amount, type, form and options otherwise available under the retirement system and except as otherwise provided under this subsection, are paid upon or after the member’s retirement or separation from service; and

Joint survivor benefit options are not available to alternate payees.

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 89, § 2.

The board shall review submitted domestic relations orders and shall promulgate rules and regulations for the determination of the qualified status of a submitted order and for the administration of distributions under the qualified order. Upon a determination that an order is qualified, the board shall notify the participating member and the named alternate payee of the qualified order.

For purposes of this section, “qualified domestic relations order” means any judgment, decree or order including approval of a property settlement agreement, which:

Relates to the provision of child or spousal support or to marital property rights of a spouse, former spouse, child or other dependent of a member;

Is made pursuant to the domestic relations law of any state; and

Creates or recognizes the existence of an alternate payee’s right to, or assigns to an alternate payee the right to, receive all or a part of the member’s account or of the benefits payable to the member.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 114, § 27; W.S. 1957, § 9-320; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; W.S. 1977, §§

9-3-426

, 9-5-226; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 202, § 1; 1989, ch. 100, § 1; ch. 159, § 1; 1993, ch. 149, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 89, §§ 1, 2; 2017 ch. 172, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 83, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in the middle of (c) substituted “volunteer firefighter and EMT pension account established under
W.S.

35-9-617

” for “volunteer firemen’s pension fund account established under
W.S.

35-9-602

.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in the introductory language of (c), substituted "volunteer firefighter, EMT and search and rescue pension account" for "volunteer firefighter and EMT pension account."

Quoted

in

Broadhead v. Broadhead, 737 P.2d 731,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 442

(Wyo. 1987).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Employee retirement pension benefits as exempt from garnishment, attachment, levy, execution or similar proceedings, 93 ALR3d 711.

Pension or retirement benefits as subject to award or division by court in settlement of property rights between spouses, 94 ALR3d 176.

Enforcement of claim for alimony or support, or for attorneys' fees and costs incurred in connection therewith, against exemptions, 52 ALR5th 221.

§ 9-3-427.
Other retirement plans prohibited.

The establishment of any annuity plan, limited service plan, pension or retirement system other than that provided by this article by any department, board, bureau or agency of the state or by any political subdivision of the state is prohibited, except this prohibition does not apply to the Wyoming state highway patrol, game and fish warden and criminal investigator retirement program. Any county memorial hospital or special hospital district that elects to participate in the state retirement system shall not otherwise participate in any other retirement system.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 114, § 28; W.S. 1957, § 9-321; Laws 1973, ch. 124, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

9-3-427

, 9-5-227; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 202, § 1; 2008, ch. 45, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, added the last sentence.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2008, ch. 45, §
3, provides:

“(a) Coverage of county hospital or special hospital district employees as authorized under section 1 of this act shall not be implemented by the Wyoming retirement board until funds payable to the Wyoming retirement system are received for deposit into the retirement account, as necessary for maintaining the actuarial integrity of the account and funding all liability arising under this act, for years of service prior to the date of entry or expansion of coverage.

“(b) Prior to January 1, 2009, any county memorial hospital or special hospital district shall elect to participate in either the retirement plan offered by the institution or the Wyoming retirement system.
Each hospital shall, prior to January 1, 2009, provide written notice to the Wyoming retirement board of its election under this subsection.”

§ 9-3-428.
Construction of article; limitation of liability of state; termination of system.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to:

Acknowledge any past, present or future liability of or obligate the state of Wyoming for contribution except the employer’s contributions provided for in this article, to either the Wyoming retirement system provided by this article or any other retirement system previously existing in the state of Wyoming; or

Constitute a contract or binding obligation of any kind whatsoever or, except as provided in subsection (b) of this section to create or grant any vested right or interest in any individual, corporation or body politic.

If the system is terminated, all affected members have a nonforfeitable interest in their benefits that were accrued and funded to date. The value of the accrued benefits to be credited to the account of each affected member shall be calculated as of the date of termination.

Subject to subsection (a) of this section and W.S. 9-3-429(b), the legislature declares its intent that the system is intended to be a permanent system and has not been created for the purpose of income tax benefits.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 114, § 29; W.S. 1957, § 9-322; W.S. 1977, §§

9-3-428

, 9-5-228; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 202, § 1; 2010, ch. 58, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a)(ii), inserted “, except as provided in subsection (b) of this section”; and added (b) and (c).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 9-3-429.
False statements and records prohibited; right to modify article.

Any person who knowingly makes a false statement or falsifies or permits to be falsified any record used in the administration of this article, in an attempt to defraud the board, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

The right to alter, amend or repeal this article or any provision thereof is reserved to the legislature.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 114, §§ 25, 31; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-323, 9-324; W.S. 1977, §§

9-3-429

, 9-5-229, 9-5-230; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 202, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to penalties for misdemeanors where not prescribed by statute, see §

6-10-103

.

§ 9-3-430.
Application for benefits; benefit payment effective dates; minimum distribution rules.

A member shall submit a written application for benefits to the system before benefits shall begin. The written application for benefits shall be on forms adopted by the board.

Benefits are payable the last day of the month following the month in which the member’s final contributions and employer contributions are remitted to the system and the member has submitted a complete and accurate application under subsection (a) of this section. Retirement is effective the day following the member’s last working day in the system or anytime after that time when the member qualifies under W.S.

9-3-415

,

9-3-416

or

9-3-431

.

Benefit payments under the system shall begin by the later of April 1 of the calendar year following the year in which the member reaches age seventy and one-half (70 1/2) years or retires. The member’s entire interest in the system shall be distributed over the life of the member or the lives of the member and a designated beneficiary, over a period not extending beyond the life expectancy of the member or the life expectancy of the member and designated beneficiary. If a member dies after distribution of benefits has begun, the remaining portion of the member’s interest shall be distributed at least as rapidly as under the method of distribution prior to the member’s death. If a member dies before distribution of benefits has begun, the entire interest of the member shall be distributed within five (5) years of the member’s death. The five (5) year payment rule shall not apply to any portion of the member’s interest which is payable to a designated beneficiary over the life or life expectancy of the beneficiary and which begins within one (1) year after the date of the member’s death. The five (5) year payment rule shall not apply to any portion of the member’s interest which is payable to a surviving spouse payable over the life or life expectancy of the spouse which begins not later than the date the member would have reached age seventy and one-half (70 1/2) years. The board may by rule and regulation modify distributions under this section in order to provide minimum distributions required by section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code or as otherwise necessary to retain qualified plan status under the Internal Revenue Code.

This section applies to benefits payable under W.S.

9-3-432

.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 67, § 1; 2001, ch. 65, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 82, § 2; 2010, ch. 58, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (c), added the present last sentence.

§ 9-3-431.
Firefighter members; contributions; benefit eligibility; service and disability retirement benefits; termination of benefits upon failure to make timely contribution payments.

In addition to contributions paid under W.S.

9-3-412

and

9-3-413

, each firefighter member shall pay into the account nine and sixty-five hundredths percent (9.65%) of his salary to qualify for benefits under this section. The employer of the firefighter member may pay any or all of the employee contributions imposed under this subsection. The board may increase the contribution percentage required under this subsection by not more than one percent (1%), as necessary to maintain the actuarial integrity of the account as affected by benefits payable under this section. Payments under this subsection shall be made monthly to the account in accordance with W.S.

9-3-412

and

9-3-413

.

Normal retirement benefits are payable under this section to any firefighter member who:

Has at least four (4) years of service credit as a firefighter member and is at least sixty (60) years of age;

Has at least twenty-five (25) years of service credit as a firefighter member and is at least fifty (50) years of age; or

Is at least fifty-five (55) years of age and has a combined total years of age and years of service credit as a firefighter member which equals not less than seventy-five (75).

Early retirement benefits are payable under this section to any firefighter member who:

Has at least four (4) but less than twenty-five (25) years of service credit as a firefighter member and is at least fifty (50) but less than sixty (60) years of age; or

Is less than fifty (50) years of age and has at least twenty-five (25) years of service credit as a firefighter member.

The early retirement benefit amount payable under subsection (c) of this section is equal to the normal retirement benefit amount payable under subsection (b) of this section reduced to an actuarial equivalent amount as prescribed by rule and regulation of the board.

The normal benefit for a firefighter member under this section is equal to two and one-half percent (2 1/2%) of the highest average salary, as defined by W.S. 9-3-402(a)(xix)(A), multiplied by the member’s years of service credit as a firefighter member.

Upon retirement for a partial or total disability as determined and for which the member otherwise qualifies under W.S.

9-3-422

, a firefighter member shall receive a monthly disability retirement benefit for the period of qualified disability equal to sixty-five percent (65%) of his salary at the time the disability was incurred. Disability benefits are payable under this subsection for the life of the firefighter member or until the firefighter member is no longer disabled. The firefighter member is subject to reporting, evaluation and excess earnings deduction requirements imposed under W.S.

9-3-423

.

The firefighter member retirement benefit program established under this section shall be discontinued by the board, and retirement benefits prescribed under this section shall be discontinued, if at any time contributions for all firefighter members required under subsection (a) of this section are not paid monthly to the retirement system when due as required by subsection (a) of this section. Upon termination of benefits under this subsection, the retirement benefits for firefighter members shall revert to and be paid under W.S.

9-3-415

and as otherwise prescribed for general members under this article. The firefighter member retirement program may be reactivated following application to and approval by the board and payment of the required contributions to cover both normal costs and any additional liability accruing during the period of program termination as determined by the system actuary. If benefits are terminated and not reactivated under this subsection, a firefighter member may receive additional benefits in proportion to the additional contributions paid on his behalf under this section, as determined by the system’s actuary.

Benefits shall not be payable under the system to the extent that they exceed the limitations imposed by section 415(b) of the Internal Revenue Code. The board shall provide any benefits in excess of the limitations under special pay plans authorized under W.S. 9-3-405(b) to the extent the benefits can be provided and the system retain qualified plan status under the Internal Revenue Code.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 65, § 1; 2010, ch. 58, § 1; 2012, ch. 108, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added (h).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, added “as defined by W.S. 9-3-402(a)(xix)(A)” in (e).

§ 9-3-432.
Law enforcement officers; contributions; benefit eligibility; service and disability benefits; death benefits; benefit options.

Each law enforcement officer shall pay into the account eight and six-tenths percent (8.6%) of his salary to fund benefits provided to law enforcement officers. Any contribution required under this subsection or subsection (b) of this section shall be paid by the employer from the source of funds used to pay officer salaries in order to be treated as employer contributions for the sole purpose of determining tax treatment under the United States Internal Revenue Code, § 414(h). These payments by the employer are subject to W.S. 9-3-412(c).

Each employer of a law enforcement officer covered under this article shall pay into the account a contribution equal to eight and six-tenths percent (8.6%) of the salary paid to each of its law enforcement officers covered under this article and may pay into the account any amount of the officer’s share of contributions under subsection (a) of this section. Payments under this subsection shall be made monthly to the account in accordance with W.S.

9-3-413

and are subject to the penalties imposed under W.S.

9-3-413

for delinquent contributions. No additional contribution shall be imposed upon the state, any city, town or county for benefits provided law enforcement officers under this article.

Normal retirement benefits are payable under this section to any law enforcement officer who:

Has at least four (4) years of service credit as a law enforcement officer and is at least sixty (60) years of age; or

Has at least twenty (20) years of service credit as a law enforcement officer regardless of age.

Early retirement benefits are payable to any law enforcement officer who has at least four (4) years but less than twenty (20) years of service credit and is at least fifty (50) years of age.

The normal retirement benefit for a law enforcement officer under this section is equal to two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the highest average salary multiplied by the years of the officer’s service credit, as determined under W.S.

9-3-417

. The benefit under this subsection shall not exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of the officer’s highest average salary. Notwithstanding W.S. 9-3-402(a)(xix), “highest average salary” as used in this section means the average annual salary of a law enforcement officer for the highest paid five (5) continuous years of service.

The early retirement benefit payable under subsection (d) of this section is equal to the normal retirement benefit payable under subsection (e) of this section reduced to an actuarial equivalent amount as prescribed by rule and regulation of the board.

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 107, § 3.

Notwithstanding W.S.

9-3-422

, any law enforcement officer in service for which contributions have been paid because of a duty connected illness or injury, or except as otherwise provided under this subsection, any law enforcement officer with ten (10) years of service credit under this article because of a nonduty connected illness or injury, may retire on account of a total or partial disability in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the board. Any law enforcement officer previously covered under W.S.

15-5-301

through

15-5-314

and transferred under this article may because of a nonduty connected illness or injury and regardless of the number of years of service credit under this article, retire on account of total or partial disability. The board shall determine mental or physical incapacitation for disability retirement under this section in accordance with W.S.

9-3-422

(a) and rules and regulation of the board, and the cost of any required examination or test shall be paid as provided by W.S. 9-3-422 and rule and regulation of the board. Any law enforcement officer receiving a nonduty-connected disability benefit under this section is subject to reporting, evaluation and excess earnings deduction requirements imposed under W.S.

9-3-423

and rule and regulation of the board. Upon retirement for a disability as determined and for which a member qualifies under this section, a law enforcement officer shall for the life of the officer or until the officer is no longer disabled, receive:

For a partial or total duty connected disability incurred, a monthly retirement benefit for the period of qualified disability equal to sixty-two and one-half percent (62.5%) of his salary at the time the disability was incurred;

For a partial or total nonduty connected disability incurred, a monthly retirement benefit for the period of qualified disability equal to fifty percent (50%) of his salary at the time the disability was incurred.

Notwithstanding W.S.

9-3-421

, any surviving spouse of an officer who dies in the scope of employment shall receive a monthly payment equal to sixty-two and one-half percent (62.5%) of the officer’s salary at the time of death, plus six percent (6%) of that salary for each child under age eighteen (18), not to exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the officer’s salary. Any surviving spouse of an officer who dies outside of the scope of employment shall receive a monthly payment equal to fifty percent (50%) of the officer’s salary at the time of death, plus six percent (6%) of that salary for each child under age eighteen (18), not to exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the officer’s salary. Notwithstanding any other provision in this subsection, any surviving spouse of any officer who retired under W.S.

15-5-301

through

15-5-314

shall receive a monthly pension equal to two-thirds (2/3) of the pension the retired law enforcement officer was receiving at the time of his death, plus sixty dollars ($60.00) for each child under age eighteen (18), not to exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the officer’s salary.

Except as provided by subsection (j) of this section, benefits specified under W.S.

9-3-421

apply to beneficiaries of a deceased officer covered under this article.

Instead of the service retirement benefits provided under this section, any officer may elect one (1) of the forms of retirement benefits specified under W.S.

9-3-420

. Unless otherwise provided by a benefit option selected by the officer under W.S.

9-3-420

, if an officer receiving benefits or his beneficiary receiving benefits under this section dies before the total amount of benefits paid to either the member or his beneficiary or both equals the amount of the officer’s account at retirement, then the excess, if any, shall be paid to any other named beneficiary, if any, or to the officer’s estate.

Benefits shall not be payable under the system to the extent that they exceed the limitations imposed by section 415(b) of the Internal Revenue Code. The board shall provide any benefits in excess of the limitations under special pay plans authorized under W.S. 9-3-405(b) to the extent the benefits can be provided and the system retain qualified plan status under the Internal Revenue Code.

Any peace officer as defined by W.S. 6-1-104(a)(vi)(P) shall be eligible for disability benefits and death benefits under this section if the peace officer’s disabilities or death are duty connected. Contributions for the benefits shall be paid as follows:

The department of state parks and cultural resources shall pay into the account from general or nongeneral fund sources a contribution equal to one percent (1%) of the salary paid to the officer. No additional contribution shall be imposed upon the state for benefits provided peace officers under this subsection;

Contributions under this subsection shall be made monthly to the account in accordance with W.S.

9-3-413

and are subject to the provisions of W.S.

9-3-413

for delinquent contributions;

Contributions under this subsection shall be paid by the employer from the source of funds used to pay peace officer salaries in order to be treated as employer contributions for the sole purpose of determining tax treatment under the United States Internal Revenue Code, § 414(h).

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 82, § 1; 2003, ch. 163, § 1; 2004, ch. 55, § 1; ch. 65, § 1; 2005, ch. 152, § 1; 2007, ch. 47, § 1; 2010, ch. 58, § 1; 2012, ch. 107, § 3; 2015 ch. 150, § 1, effective March 5, 2015.

Cross references. —

For provisions pertaining to the Wyoming state board of outfitters and guides, see §

23-2-408

.

The 2004 amendments. —

The first 2004 amendment, by ch. 55, § 1, effective July 1, 2004, added (g)(ii), making related changes.

The second 2004 amendment, by ch. 65, § 1, effective July 1, 2004, in (h), in the first sentence, inserted the exception, and added the second sentence.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2005 amendment

, in (h), inserted “nonduty-connected” in the fourth sentence.

Laws 2005, ch. 152, § 1, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2005.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “a duty connected” for “in the scope of employment” and “a nonduty connected” for “outside of the scope of employment” or similar language throughout the section.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added (n).

The 2012 amendment,

repealed (g), which read: “Notwithstanding W.S. 9-3-419(b) and on July 1 of each year: (i) Subject to paragraph (ii) of this subsection, benefits provided under this section shall be increased by two percent (2%) for individuals who have been receiving benefits under this section or W.S.

15-5-301

through

15-5-314

for at least two (2) years, either alone or in combination with an officer, if the individual is a survivor; (ii) The board may for any increase under paragraph (i) of this subsection for any year, reduce the percentage adjustment to a level the system's actuary determines renders the system actuarially sound.”

Laws 2012, ch. 107, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2012.

The 2015 amendment

added (o).

Laws 2015, ch. 150, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2015.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2002, ch. 82, § 4, provides:

“(a)

Except for the city of Cheyenne as provided under subsection (b) of this section, each city, town or county with law enforcement officers covered under the Wyoming retirement system or under a police pension fund established pursuant to W.S.

15-5-301

through

15-5-314

shall on or before June 30, 2003 transfer the covered officers for coverage under W.S.

9-3-432

or ensure retirement system coverage for its officers under W.S.

9-3-432

, as applicable, as of the date of entry or expansion of coverage. In addition, all assets of any police pension fund shall be transferred by the city, town or county to the retirement system not later than the date of entry into the system.

“(b)

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the police pension fund of the city of Cheyenne shall be transferred to the retirement system on or before June 30, 2004, for purposes of W.S.

9-3-432

and

9-3-401

through

9-3-431

, as applicable, provided the city pays for any liability created under W.S.

15-5-301

through

15-5-314

and for coverage of officers under the retirement system prior to the date of transfer.

“(c)

Coverage of Wyoming law enforcement academy instructors, investigators of the Wyoming livestock board and Wyoming correctional officers under W.S.

9-3-432

as created by section 1 of this act, and the transfer of law enforcement officers covered under a police pension fund of a city, town or county to coverage under W.S.

9-3-432

, as created by section 1 of this act, shall not be implemented by the Wyoming retirement board until funds payable to the Wyoming retirement system are received as required by this section for deposit into the retirement account, as necessary for maintaining the actuarial integrity of the account and funding all liability arising under this act, for years of service prior to the date of entry or expansion of coverage.

“(d)

In addition to subsection (c) of this section, W.S.

9-3-432

, as created by section 1 of this act, shall not be implemented by the Wyoming retirement board until funds necessary for maintaining the actuarial integrity of the account and funding any liability arising under this act, are deposited into the Wyoming retirement account, and contributions required under W.S.

9-3-432

(a) and (b), as created under section 1 of this act, are paid to the Wyoming retirement system for deposit into the retirement account for at least two (2) months of covered service following the date of entry or expansion of coverage, as applicable.”

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 82, § 7, provides that for the purposes of this act, the Wyoming retirement system is to be separated into two (2) systems for accounting and actuarial purposes, and additionally creates the Wyoming Law Enforcement Retirement System for the purposes and funding created by the act.

Laws 2015, ch. 163, § 3 states as follows:
“Peace officers eligible for coverage under W.S. 9-3-432(o) on the effective date of this act may elect coverage under that subsection no later than August 1, 2015. The election shall be irrevocable. Death and disability benefits shall be payable under W.S. 9-3-432(o) to members who timely elect coverage under this section irrespective of whether the disability condition arose out of an injury or illness that occurred prior to the date of coverage. Benefits shall not be payable, however, if the application for benefits was made prior to the effective date of this act. If no election is made under this section, eligibility for death and disability benefits shall be as otherwise provided under W.S.

9-3-422

.”

Legislative intent. —

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 82, § 5 states that it is the intention of the legislature because the benefits of the law enforcement pension account are mandated by state law, that the state of Wyoming fund the unfunded accrued liability of the account. The unfunded liability is to be amortized over a twenty (20) year period with annual payments by the state to be in an actuarially determined amount.